Washington statutes.
RCW 10.77.230

Appellate review.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1359-S2.SL) ***

Either party may seek appellate review of the judgment of any hearing held pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1988 c 202 s 16; 1974 ex.s. c 198 s 18; 1973 1st ex.s. c 117 s 23.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 2.2, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.